Washington statutes.
RCW 42.52.330

Interpretation.

By constitutional design, the legislature consists of citizen-legislators who bring to bear on the legislative process their individual experience and expertise. The provisions of this chapter shall be interpreted in light of this constitutional principle.

[ 1994 c 154 s 203.]